New Mexico, session 2026, HB297.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Two million four hundred thousand dollars ($2,400,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the board of regents of the university of New Mexico for expenditure in fiscal years 2027 through 2029 to support project ECHO'S structured literacy educator support initiatives. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2029 shall revert to the general fund. .233702.1